North Carolina statutes. Chapter 44. Liens.
Article 1. Mechanics’, Laborers’, and Materialmen’s Liens. [Repealed]

§ 44-1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1112, s. 4.

§§ 44-2 through 44-5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 1029, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to possessory liens on personal property, see

G.S. 44A-1

et seq.